Hawaii statutes.
[§148-64]
Enforcement. (a) The department of agriculture, through its authorized agents and employees, shall enforce this part.

(b) The
department of agriculture or its authorized agent may examine, during normal
business hours, any ledgers, books, accounts, memoranda, and other documents,
fresh or processed agricultural products, supplies, and equipment, and any
other articles and things used in connection with the business of a person
licensed under this part. [L 2002, c 163, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next